Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE D. PREVENTION, CONTROL, AND REPORTS OF DISEASES; PUBLIC HEALTH DISASTERS AND EMERGENCIES

CHAPTER 95A. REPORTS ON PREVENTION AND TREATMENT OF DIABETES

Sec. 95A.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "council" means the Texas Diabetes Council.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 409 (S.B. 796), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0331, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 95A.002. BIENNIAL REPORT ON COMMISSION'S PRIORITIES FOR ADDRESSING DIABETES. (a) The commission, in coordination with the council, shall prepare a biennial report that identifies the commission's priorities for addressing diabetes within the Medicaid population.

(b) Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall submit the report to the legislature and the governor.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 409 (S.B. 796), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.